Louisiana, session 2026, HB669.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1.(A) The Grand Isle Port Commission may use, in accordance with this Act,
the following described state water bottoms, water columns, and water surfaces above the
specified sections of water bottoms:
An area of approximately twenty-seven and one-half acres in Bayou Rigaud,
Jefferson Parish, Louisiana, circumscribed by lines connecting the following points
(projection in North American datum, 1983):
(1) The Northeast corner is located at 29 degrees, 14 minutes, 23.57 seconds,
North, 90 degrees, 01 minutes, 08.24 seconds, West.
(2) The Southeast corner is located at 29 degrees, 14 minutes, 16.39 seconds,
North, 90 degrees, 01 minutes, 00.65 seconds, West.
(3) The Southwest corner is at 29 degrees, 14 minutes, 13.15 seconds, North,
90 degrees, 01 minutes, 19.07 seconds, West.
(4) The Northwest corner is at 29 degrees, 14 minutes, 21.56 seconds, North,
90 degrees, 01 minutes, 20.98 seconds, West.
(B) The port commission is authorized to use such water bottoms, water
columns, and water surfaces for the sole purpose of an off-bottom oyster (Crassotrea
Virginica) culture project undertaken in cooperation with Louisiana Sea Grant
program subject to approval of all state and federal agencies with jurisdiction over
activities conducted in connection with the project.
Page 1 of 2

HB NO. 669 ENROLLED
Section 2. The commissioner of administration, on behalf of the state of Louisiana,
and the Grand Isle Port Commission are hereby authorized to enter into such agreements,
covenants, conditions, and stipulations and to execute such documents as necessary to
properly effectuate the use of property described in Section 1 of this Act, and as more
specifically described in any such agreements entered into and documents executed by and
between the state and the port commission. In determining appropriate compensation for
the use of state property authorized by this Act, the commissioner may consider potential
economic development and other benefits resulting from the research contemplated.
Section 3. The Grand Isle Port Commission may, in cooperation with the Louisiana
Sea Grant program, participate in a seafood research and economic development program
in the area described in Section 1 of this Act.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2